Nevada, session 83, SB456.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 223.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.085 1. The Governor may, within the limits of available
money, employ such persons as he or she deems necessary to
provide an appropriate staff for the Office of the Governor,
including, without limitation, the Office of Economic Development,
[the Office of Federal Assistance,] the Office of Science, Innovation
and Technology, the Public Health Resource Office and the
Governor’s mansion. Except as otherwise provided by specific
statute, such employees are not in the classified or unclassified
service of the State and, except as otherwise provided in NRS
231.043 and 231.047, serve at the pleasure of the Governor. Such
staff and employees include, without limitation:
(a) Executive staff;
(b) Administrative and clerical staff;
(c) Outreach and communications staff;
(d) Research and analytical staff; and
(e) Any other persons the Governor determines are necessary to
effectively fulfill the duties, responsibilities and obligations of the
Office of the Governor.
2. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, the
Governor shall:
(a) Determine the salaries and benefits of the persons employed
pursuant to subsection 1, within limits of money available for that
purpose; and
(b) Adopt such rules and policies as he or she deems appropriate
to establish the duties and employment rights of the persons
employed pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Governor shall appoint a Chief Information Officer of
the State who is responsible for:
(a) Information technology leadership and accountability;
(b) Strategic planning for information technology;
(c) Information technology workforce for the State;
(d) Budgeting and planning for information technology for the
State;
(e) Data storage and integrity;
(f) Investment management for information technology;
-
*SB456*

– 3 –
(g) Information technology security, cyber security and privacy;
and
(h) Any other duties or responsibilities prescribed by statute or
regulation.
4. The Governor shall appoint a Chief Innovation Officer of
the State who is responsible for:
(a) Providing overall leadership and guidance relating to
employee acquisition, career development, succession planning,
retention, professional development and training, leadership
development, compensation and benefits;
(b) Developing human resource plans and strategies
prospectively by at least 10 years;
(c) Reviewing and monitoring the efficiency of the State
Government and providing recommendations on how to reduce
costs, improve the delivery of services and ensure the cost-
effectiveness of all state governmental programs;
(d) Evaluating, overseeing and administering the
competitiveness, appropriateness and effectiveness of the wages,
salaries, benefits and work environment of public employees;
(e) Evaluating, overseeing and administering the training and
readiness programs for public employees; and
(f) Developing comprehensive and strategic recruitment and
retention plans to meet the human resource needs of the State.
Sec. 2. NRS 223.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.400 1. The Office of Finance is hereby created in the
Office of the Governor.
2. The Office of Finance consists of a Director and the
following:
(a) The Budget Division; [and]
(b) The Division of Internal Audits [.] ; and
(c) The Office of Federal Assistance.
Sec. 3. NRS 223.462 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.462 [“Director”] “Deputy Director” means the Deputy
Director [of] for the Office [.] of Federal Assistance.
Sec. 4. NRS 223.472 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.472 1. There is hereby created within the Office of [the
Governor] Finance the Office of Federal Assistance for the purpose
of obtaining and maximizing federal assistance.
2. The [Governor] Director of the Office of Finance shall
propose a budget for the Office [.] of Federal Assistance.
3. The Office of Federal Assistance shall maintain an office
located in an urban area in northern Nevada and an office located in
an urban area in southern Nevada.
-
*SB456*

– 4 –
Sec. 5. NRS 223.474 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.474 1. The [Governor] Director of the Office of Finance
shall appoint a Deputy Director [of] for the Office of Federal
Assistance who must possess:
(a) Extensive expertise and experience in applying for and
receiving federal assistance;
(b) Specialized knowledge of the process of grant writing and
approval in the public and private sectors; and
(c) Proven experience in designing and managing programs
which rely solely or partially upon federal assistance.
2. The Deputy Director shall devote his or her entire time and
attention to the business of his or her office and shall not engage in
any other gainful employment or occupation.
3. The Deputy Director is in the unclassified service of the
State and serves at the pleasure of the [Governor.] Director of the
Office of Finance.
Sec. 6. NRS 223.476 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.476 The Deputy Director shall, within the limits of money
appropriated or authorized to be expended for this purpose, employ
such persons in the classified or unclassified service of the State as
he or she deems necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS
223.460 to 223.498, inclusive.
Sec. 7. NRS 223.478 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.478 1. The Deputy Director [of] for the Office of Federal
Assistance shall:
(a) Coordinate and collaborate with state agencies, local
agencies, tribal governments and nonprofit organizations to
implement the State Plan for Maximizing Federal Assistance
developed pursuant to NRS 223.486;
(b) To the extent money is available, administer a grant
management system;
(c) Develop a manual of policies and procedures relating to
federal assistance and post the manual on the Internet website
maintained by the Office;
(d) Serve as the entity designated by the State to review and
coordinate proposed federal financial assistance and direct federal
development for purposes of 47 Fed. Reg. 30,959 (July 14, 1982);
(e) To the greatest extent practicable, coordinate with the
members of Congress representing this State to combine efforts
relating to identifying and managing available federal assistance;
(f) To the greatest extent practicable, if requested by a state
agency, research the availability of federal assistance for the state
agency.
-
*SB456*

– 5 –
(g) To the greatest extent practicable, ensure that state agencies
are aware of any opportunities to obtain federal assistance for which
they are or may be eligible.
(h) To the greatest extent practicable, if requested by the
executive head of a state agency, advise the state agency concerning
the requirements for receiving and managing federal assistance;
(i) To the greatest extent practicable, coordinate with state
agencies and local agencies that have received federal assistance for
similar projects to ensure that the efforts and services of those
agencies are not duplicated.
(j) To the greatest extent practicable, serve as a clearinghouse
for disseminating information relating to unexpended grant money
of state agencies by:
(1) Compiling and updating periodically a list of the grants
and unexpended amounts thereof for which the Office received
notification from state agencies pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
223.480; and
(2) Making the list available on the Internet website
maintained by the Office;
(k) To the greatest extent practicable, develop and provide to
state agencies, local agencies, tribal governments and nonprofit
organizations, training opportunities relating to the acquisition and
administration of grants, including, without limitation, compliance
with requirements during the term of the grant; and
(l) On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, submit to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature a report regarding all activity relating to the application
for, receipt of and use of grants in this State.
2. The Deputy Director may:
(a) Adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section
and NRS 223.480 and 223.482.
(b) If requested by a state agency, local agency, tribal
government or nonprofit organization, write grant proposals and
applications and otherwise assist such an entity in obtaining federal
resources.
(c) Provide administrative support to the Nevada Advisory
Council on Federal Assistance created by NRS 358.020.
Sec. 8. NRS 223.484 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.484 1. The Account for the Office of Federal Assistance
is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Account must be
administered by the Deputy Director.
2. Any money accepted pursuant to NRS 223.482 must be
deposited in the Account.
-
*SB456*

– 6 –
3. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
4. The money in the Account which is donated for a purpose
specified by the donor, within the scope of the duties of the Deputy
Director, must only be used for that purpose. If no purpose is
specified, the money in the Account must only be used to carry out
the duties of the Deputy Director.
5. Claims against the Account must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
Sec. 9. NRS 223.486 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.486 1. The Deputy Director shall, in consultation with
the Nevada Advisory Council on Federal Assistance created by NRS
358.020, develop and may periodically revise a State Plan for
Maximizing Federal Assistance, which must identify:
(a) Methods for expanding opportunities for obtaining federal
assistance, including, without limitation, expanding opportunities
for obtaining matching funds for federal assistance through the
Nevada Grant Matching Program created by NRS 223.490;
(b) Methods for streamlining process, regulatory, structural and
other barriers to the acquisition of federal assistance that exist at
each level of federal, state or local government;
(c) Methods for the effective administration of grants, including,
without limitation, best practices relating to indirect cost allocation;
(d) Opportunities for:
(1) Reducing administrative costs associated with obtaining
federal assistance; and
(2) Coordination between state agencies, local agencies,
tribal governments and nonprofit organizations to avoid duplication
and achieve common goals;
(e) Specific tasks which must be performed to improve the
administration of grants and maximize the amount of federal
assistance received by this State and a schedule for implementing
any such tasks;
(f) Performance metrics and targets relating to obtaining and
maximizing federal assistance and improving the administration of
grants; and
(g) Best practices for considering whether to respond to a grant
opportunity, including, without limitation, the monetary and
programmatic cost of implementing a grant.
2. The Deputy Director shall post the State Plan for
Maximizing Federal Assistance on the Internet website maintained
by the Office.
-
*SB456*

– 7 –
Sec. 10. NRS 223.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.490 The Nevada Grant Matching Program is hereby
created within the Office. The Program must:
1. Allow state agencies, local agencies, tribal governments and
nonprofit organizations to request grants from the Grant Matching
Account created by NRS 223.492 for the purpose of satisfying the
matching funds requirement for a federal grant;
2. Provide a clear, streamlined and timely process for state
agencies, local agencies, tribal governments and nonprofit
organizations to apply for matching funds for a specific federal
grant and receive a prompt decision from the Deputy Director; and
3. Prioritize grants that:
(a) Add services to constituents;
(b) Align with the documented priorities of the state agency,
local agency, tribal government or nonprofit organization;
(c) Address the needs of underserved or frontier communities;
(d) Help state agencies, local agencies, tribal governments and
nonprofit organizations build capacity for future grant opportunities;
and
(e) Enable a state agency, local agency, tribal government or
nonprofit organization to sustain the grant in its next budget.
Sec. 11. NRS 223.494 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.494 1. The Deputy Director shall consult with the
Nevada Advisory Council on Federal Assistance created by NRS
358.020, grant professionals employed by the State and other grant
experts to develop:
(a) A process for:
(1) State agencies, local agencies, tribal governments and
nonprofit organizations to make a request for a grant for matching
funds;
(2) The payment or transfer of grant money; and
(3) Reporting on the use and implementation of grant
awards; and
(b) Criteria for the review, award and notification of grant
requests.
2. The Deputy Director shall administer all applicable aspects
of the process set forth in subsection 1.
Sec. 12. NRS 223.496 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.496 To be eligible for a grant from the Grant Matching
Account created by NRS 223.492, a state agency, local agency,
tribal government or nonprofit organization must:
1. Demonstrate that:
(a) It is pursuing a bona fide federal grant for which it is
eligible;
-
*SB456*

– 8 –
(b) It attempted but was unable to secure adequate matching
funding through its own budget or in-kind resources;
(c) The grant is within its scope;
(d) The grant is a competitive grant; and
(e) The grant will provide not less than $2 for each $1 received
from the Grant Matching Account.
2. Apply for a grant in the form and process prescribed by the
Deputy Director.
3. Adhere to other requirements deemed appropriate for the
Program.
Sec. 13. NRS 223.498 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.498 On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year,
the Deputy Director [of the Office] shall prepare and submit to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature a summary report for the Program detailing:
1. The number and purpose of grant requests received from
state agencies, local agencies, tribal governments and nonprofit
organizations;
2. The number and purpose of grant requests approved and the
amount of money awarded from the Grant Matching Account
created by NRS 223.492 to each approved grant request applicant;
and
3. The amount of federal grant funding received by each grant
applicant as a result of receiving money from the Grant Matching
Account.
Sec. 14. NRS 358.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
358.020 1. The Nevada Advisory Council on Federal
Assistance is hereby created. The Council consists of the following
11 members:
(a) One member of the Senate appointed by the Majority Leader
of the Senate.
(b) One member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly.
(c) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate
who represents a nonprofit organization, a local agency or a tribal
government.
(d) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly who
represents a nonprofit organization, a local agency or a tribal
government.
(e) One member appointed by the Governor who represents a
nonprofit organization that provides grants in this State.
(f) One member appointed by the Governor who represents a
local government.
(g) One member appointed by the Governor who represents
private businesses.
-
*SB456*

– 9 –
(h) The State Treasurer, who may name a designee to serve on
the Council on his or her behalf.
(i) The State Controller, who may name a designee to serve on
the Council on his or her behalf.
(j) The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of
Finance [.] , who may name a designee to serve on the Council on
his or her behalf.
(k) The Deputy Director [of] for the Office of Federal
Assistance.
2. The members described in:
(a) Paragraphs (a) to (i), inclusive, of subsection 1 are voting
members.
(b) Paragraphs (j) and (k) of subsection 1 are nonvoting
members.
3. The Governor shall, to the extent practicable, collaborate to
ensure that the persons appointed pursuant to paragraphs (e), (f) and
(g) of subsection 1 are representative of the urban and rural areas of
this State.
4. Each appointed member of the Council serves a term of 2
years.
5. An appointed member of the Council:
(a) May be reappointed.
(b) Shall not serve more than three terms.
6. Any vacancy occurring in the appointed membership of the
Council must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment not later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs. A
member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve as a member of the
Council for the remainder of the original term of appointment.
7. Each member of the Council:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Council, is entitled to
receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
8. The Office of Federal Assistance shall provide the Council
with administrative support.
Sec. 15. NRS 358.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
358.040 1. The Council shall:
(a) Advise and assist the Deputy Director with:
(1) Developing and carrying out the State Plan For
Maximizing Federal Assistance required by NRS 223.486; and
(2) Carrying out the provisions of NRS 223.460 to 223.498,
inclusive, including, without limitation, any training provided by the
Deputy Director pursuant to paragraph (k) of subsection 1 of NRS
[232.224;] 223.478; and
-
*SB456*

– 10 –
(b) Develop legislative and executive recommendations relating
to obtaining and maximizing federal assistance in this State.
2. The Council may request information from state and local
agencies, tribal governments and nonprofit organizations for the
purposes of advising and assisting the Deputy Director with
evaluating and monitoring the success of such agencies,
governments or organizations in accordance with the stated purpose
of the Office pursuant to NRS 223.472. A state agency, local
agency, tribal government or nonprofit organization may provide
any information, collaborate with the Council or utilize any
assistance offered by the Council for the purpose of obtaining and
maximizing any federal assistance that may be available to the
agency, government or organization.
3. As used in this section:
(a) [“Director”] “Deputy Director” means the Deputy Director
[of] for the Office.
(b) “Federal assistance” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 223.464.
(c) “Office” means the Office of Federal Assistance created by
NRS 223.472.
Sec. 16. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 17. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
-
*SB456*

– 11 –
Sec. 18. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB456*